Washington statutes.
RCW 15.125.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the state liquor and cannabis board.

(2) "Licensee facilities" means any premises regulated by the board for producing, processing, or retailing cannabis or cannabis products.

(3) "Cannabis" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(4) "Cannabis processor" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(5) "Cannabis producer" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(6) "Cannabis products" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(7) "Cannabis retailer" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(8) "Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership, association, private or public corporation, governmental entity, or other business entity.

[ 2022 c 16 s 14; 2017 c 317 s 18.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Findings—Application—2017 c 317: See notes following RCW 69.50.325.